Missouri, session 2026, SB1187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 579, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 579.200, to read as
follows:
579.200. 1. A person commits the offense of
consumption of marijuana in a public space if he or she
knowingly consumes marijuana, as such term is defined in
Article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri, in a public
space that is not otherwise licensed or approved for such
purpose under Article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri.
2. The offense of consumption of marijuana in a public
space is a class B misdemeanor.
3. As used in this section, a "public space" shall be
a publicly maintained property or facility, including, but
not limited to, a street, alley, highway, park, building,
facility, or any other physical asset owned, leased, or
controlled by this state or any agency or political
subdivision thereof.
✓